Utah statutes.
63B-1a-101.   Definitions -- Bonds authorized -- Prohibitions -- Purposes --
Maturity -- Use of bonds proceeds.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Cost" includes:
(i)  all costs related to the authorized capital project, including the cost
of equipment and furnishings for, interests in, or improvements necessary,
incidental, or convenient to, those capital projects;
(ii)  all costs incident to the authorization and issuance of bonds;
(iii)  interest estimated to accrue on bonds during the period to be covered
by the acquisition and construction of the capital project and for up to 12
months after that period; and
(iv)  other amounts that the commission finds necessary to establish reserve
funds and to provide working capital related to the capital project.
(b)  "Taxable property of the state" includes all real and personal property
subject to ad valorem taxation within the state, including all property
subject to a fee-in lieu of tax.
(2)  When authorized by the Legislature, the commission may, in the manner
specified in this chapter, issue bonds to provide funds to the state for the
purpose of paying all or part of the cost of:
(a)  designing, acquiring, constructing, improving, or extending:
(i)  any one or more capital projects; or
(ii)  any interest in one or more or any combination of capital projects; or
(b)  purchasing a land sale contract, or an interest in a land sale contract,
under Section 63M-1-303.
(3)  Before issuing any bonds, the commission shall determine that the
Legislature has:
(a)  affirmatively authorized the issuance of the bonds; and
(b)  has specified:
(i)  for capital projects, the capital projects to be funded; and
(ii)  the maximum amount of the bonds.
(4)  The commission shall either:
(a)  comply with any maturity requirements established by the Legislature; or
(b)  in the absence of any maturity requirements, establish, by resolution, a
bond maturity date or dates that are not later than 15 years after the date of
delivery of the bonds.
(5) (a)  The commission may not issue bonds under this chapter in an amount
that violates the limitation described in the Utah Constitution Article XIV,
Section 1 or payable beyond the period described in the Utah Constitution
Article XIII, Section 5(3).
(b)  For purposes of applying the debt limitation contained in the Utah
Constitution Article XIV, Section 1, the value of the taxable property in Utah
is considered to be 100% of the fair market value of the taxable property of
the state as computed from the last assessment for state purposes made before
the issuance of the bonds.
